Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1315.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-154.03, to read: START_STATUTE15-154.03. Schools; interoperable communications systems; affidavits; annual readiness report; law enforcement agencies; funding A. If a school district or charter school in this state receives monies from this state or a local law enforcement agency in this state for interoperable communications, the school district or charter school shall select or develop technology, a system or a method to establish and maintain interoperable communications capabilities that include at least the following: 1. A mechanism that enables designated school personnel to notify local law enforcement agencies in real time if an emergency occurs at the school. 2. A mechanism that enables the school district or charter school to securely transmit the current map of each school campus and floor plan of each school building to local law enforcement agencies in a printable format. 3. A mechanism that enables designated school personnel to communicate with local law enforcement agencies and law enforcement officers in real time during an emergency at the school. B. On or before July 1, 2027 and July 1 of each year thereafter, each school district and charter school that estaBLISHES AND MAINTAINS INTEROPERABLE COMMUNICATIONS CAPABILITIES shall submit to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, an affidavit attesting that the school district or charter school: 1. Is maintaining the interoperable communications capabilities required by subsection A of this section. 2. Has transmitted the current maps and floor plans to local law enforcement agencies through the mechanism required by subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section. 3. Has tested each mechanism required by subsection A of this section to ensure that the school district or charter school is able to communicate with the local law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the school district or charter school is located at least once during the preceding year. C. The department shall develop guidelines and best practices to assist school districts and charter schools in meeting the requirements prescribed by this section. D. The department shall compile the affidavits submitted pursuant to subsection B of this section and shall provide an annual statewide interoperability readiness report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. E. If a local law enforcement agency in this state has monies available to establish and maintain interoperable communications capabilities with school districts and charter schools that are located within the agency's jurisdiction, the agency shall Notify each school district and charter school that is located within the agency's jurisdiction and offer to provide monies to the school district or charter school for the purposes of subsection A of this section. F. If a local law enforcement agency in this state does not have sufficient monies available to establish and maintain interoperable communications capabilities with each school district and charter school that is located within the agency's jurisdiction, the agency shall do all of the following: 1. Select school districts and charter schools for which sufficient monies are available to establish and maintain interoperable communications capabilities. 2. Notify each school district and charter school that is selected pursuant to paragraph 1 or 3 of this subsection that the school district or charter school has been selected and offer to provide monies to the school district or charter school for the purposes of subsection A of this section. 3. If a school district or charter school declines an offer that is made pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection, select another school district or charter school that is located within the agency's jurisdiction and for which sufficient monies are available to establish and maintain interoperable communications capabilities. END_STATUTE